Utah statutes.
56-1-22.   Applicability of public utility provisions.

Nothing contained in this title shall be so construed as to dispense with the necessity for railroad companies to comply with the provisions of the title relating to public utilities applicable to such companies and the conduct of their business. Provided, however, that railroad companies subject to regulation by the Interstate Commerce Commission, shall not be required to comply with the provisions of Sections 54-4-28 through 54-4-30 of said title.



Amended by Chapter 130, 1961 General Session

